Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,791,758 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Board of
Dentistry.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate May 13, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 1, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5511 (SB 5511-A) Page 1